Hawaii statutes.
[§659-5] Answer. The person to whom
the order is directed shall file the person's answer in writing, within the
time limited by the order as determined by the court in its discretion, and
state the authority under which the person claims to act. [L 1876, c 39, §39;
RL 1925, §2719; RL 1935, §4261; RL 1945, §10282; RL 1955, §236-22; HRS §659-49;
am L 1972, c 90, §3(e); ren HRS §659-5; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Burden on respondent, when. 29 H. 392 (1926).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next